Maine, session 132, LD196.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 3 MRSA §994, sub-§11, as amended by PL 2005, c. 104, §2, is further
amended to read:
11. Information available to committee. To receive certain information.
Information Except as provided in subsection 11-A, information that is made available to
the committee is governed by chapter 21, which governs legislative investigating
committees, and by Title 1, chapter 13, which governs public records and proceedings; and
Sec. 2. 3 MRSA §994, sub-§11-A is enacted to read:
11-A. Information received from subpoena. To receive papers or records provided
in response to a subpoena issued pursuant to subsection 8. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, papers or records received by the committee under this subsection
are confidential; and